test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-miskawew_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - miskaw - find him/her : # VTA-Vw verb - full paradigm; Wolvengrey p. 404; Fut+Cond from Okimāsis pp. 84, 107
  
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: nimiskawâw # SET I
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kimiskawâw
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: nimiskawânân
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kimiskawânaw
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kimiskawâwâw
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: nimiskawâwak # SET I-Pl
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: kimiskawâwak
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: nimiskawânânak
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: kimiskawânawak
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: kimiskawâwâwak
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: kimiskawin # SET II
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: kimiskawinân
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: kimiskawinâwâw
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: miskawêw # SET III
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: miskawêwak
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: miskawêyiwa
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: miskâmêw # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: miskâmêwak # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: nimiskâmâwa # SET IV
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kimiskâmâwa
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: nimiskâmânâna
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kimiskâmânawa
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kimiskâmâwâwa
     
     
     
     
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+3SgO: [nikî-miskawâw, nikîmiskawâw] # SET I (past)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+3SgO: [kikî-miskawâw, kikîmiskawâw]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+3SgO: [nikî-miskawânân, nikîmiskawânân]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+3SgO: [kikî-miskawânaw, kikîmiskawânaw]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+3SgO: [kikî-miskawâwâw, kikîmiskawâwâw]
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+3PlO: [nikî-miskawâwak, nikîmiskawâwak] # SET I-Pl (past)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+3PlO: [kikî-miskawâwak, kikîmiskawâwak]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+3PlO: [nikî-miskawânânak, nikîmiskawânânak]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+3PlO: [kikî-miskawânawak, kikîmiskawânawak]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+3PlO: [kikî-miskawâwâwak, kikîmiskawâwâwak]
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+1SgO: [kikî-miskawin, kikîmiskawin] # SET II (past)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kikî-miskawinân, kikîmiskawinân]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+1SgO: [kikî-misknawinwâw, kikîmiskawinâwâw]
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kî-miskawêw, kîmiskawêw] # SET III (past)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kî-miskawêwak, kîmiskawêwak]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [kî-miskawêyiwa, kîmiskawêyiwa]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [kî-miskâmêw, kîmiskâmêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [kî-miskâmêwak, kîmiskâmêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [nikî-miskâmâwa, nikîmiskâmâwa] # SET IV (past)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kikî-miskâmâwa, kikîmiskâmâwa]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [nikî-miskâmânâna, nikîmiskâmânâna]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kikî-miskâmânawa, kikîmiskâmânawa]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kikî-miskâmâwâwa, kikîmiskâmâwâwa]
     
     
     
     
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+3SgO: [niwî-miskawâw, niwîmiskawâw] # SET I (past)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+3SgO: [kiwî-miskawâw, kiwîmiskawâw]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+3SgO: [niwî-miskawânân, niwîmiskawânân]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-miskawânaw, kiwîmiskawânaw]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-miskawâwâw, kiwîmiskawâwâw]
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+3PlO: [niwî-miskawâwak, niwîmiskawâwak] # SET I-Pl (past)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+3PlO: [kiwî-miskawâwak, kiwîmiskawâwak]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+3PlO: [niwî-miskawânânak, niwîmiskawânânak]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-miskawânawak, kiwîmiskawânawak]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-miskawâwâwak, kiwîmiskawâwâwak]
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+1SgO: [kiwî-miskawin, kiwîmiskawin] # SET II (past)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kiwî-miskawinân, kiwîmiskawinân]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+1SgO: [kiwî-misknawinwâw, kiwîmiskawinâwâw]
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wî-miskawêw, wîmiskawêw] # SET III (past)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wî-miskawêwak, wîmiskawêwak]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-miskawêyiwa, wîmiskawêyiwa]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wî-miskâmêw, wîmiskâmêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-miskâmêwak, wîmiskâmêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-miskâmâwa, niwîmiskâmâwa] # SET IV (past)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-miskâmâwa, kiwîmiskâmâwa]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-miskâmânâna, niwîmiskâmânâna]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-miskâmânawa, kiwîmiskâmânawa]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-miskâmâwâwa, kiwîmiskâmâwâwa]

     
     
     
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+3SgO: [nika-miskawâw, nikamiskawâw] # SET I (Fut+Def)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+3SgO: [kika-miskawâw, kikamiskawâw]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+3SgO: [nika-miskawânân, nikamiskawânân]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl+3SgO: [kika-miskawânaw, kikamiskawânaw]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+3SgO: [kika-miskawâwâw, kikamiskawâwâw]
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+3PlO: [nika-miskawâwak, nikamiskawâwak] # SET I-Pl (Fut+Def)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+3PlO: [kika-miskawâwak, kikamiskawâwak]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+3PlO: [nika-miskawânânak, nikamiskawânânak]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl+3PlO: [kika-miskawânawak, kikamiskawânawak]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+3PlO: [kika-miskawâwâwak, kikamiskawâwâwak]
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+1SgO: [kika-miskawin, kikamiskawin] # SET II (Fut+Def)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kika-miskawinân, kikamiskawinân]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+1SgO: [kika-miskawinâwâw, kikamiskawinâwâw]
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ka-miskawêw, kamiskawêw] # SET III (Fut+Def)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ka-miskawêwak, kamiskawêwak]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ka-miskawêyiwa, kamiskawêyiwa]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [ka-miskâmêw, kamiskâmêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ka-miskâmêwak, kamiskâmêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [nika-miskâmâwa, nikamiskâmâwa] # SET IV (Fut+Def)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kika-miskâmâwa, kikamiskâmâwa]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [nika-miskâmânâna, nikamiskâmânâna]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kika-miskâmânawa, kikamiskâmânawa]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kika-miskâmâwâwa, kikamiskâmâwâwa]
     
     
     


     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: nimiskâk  # SET I inv
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: kimiskâk
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: nimiskâkonân
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: kimiskâkonaw
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: kimiskâkowâw
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: nimiskâkwak # SET I-Pl inv
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: kimiskâkwak
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: nimiskâkonânak
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: kimiskâkonawak
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: kimiskâkowâwak
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: kimiskâtin # SET II inv
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: kimiskâtinân
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: kimiskâtinâwâw
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: miskâk # SET III inv (no 5-3 according to Wolvengrey)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: miskâkwak
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: miskâkoyiwa
          
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: nimiskâkoyiwa # SET IV inv
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kimiskâkoyiwa
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: nimiskâkonâna
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kimiskâkonawa
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kimiskâkowâwa
     




     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: [miskawak, miskawak] # SET I
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: [miskawat, miskawat]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: [miskawâyâhk, miskawâyâhk]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: [miskawâyahk, miskawâyahk]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: [miskawâyêk, miskawâyêk]

     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: [miskawakik, miskawakik] # SET I-Pl
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: [miskawacik, miskawacik]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: [miskawâyâhkik, miskawâyâhkik]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: [miskawâyahkok, miskawâyahkok]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: [miskawâyêkok, miskawâyêkok] 
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: [miskawiyan, miskawiyan] # SET II
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [miskawiyâhk, miskawiyâhk]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: [miskawiyêk, miskawiyêk]    
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [miskawât, miskawât] # SET III
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [miskawâcik, miskawâcik]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [miskâmât, miskâmât]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [miskâmâcik, miskâmâcik]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [miskawâyit, miskawâyit]

     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [miskâmak, miskâmak] # SET IV
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [miskâmat, miskâmat]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [miskâmâyâhk, miskâmâyâhk]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [miskâmâyahk, miskâmâyahk]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [miskâmâyek, miskâmâyek]
     
     
     
     
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: [miskawit, miskawit] # SET I inv
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: [miskâsk, miskâsk]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: [miskâkoyâhk, miskâkoyâhk]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: [miskâkoyahk, miskâkoyahk]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: [miskâkoyek, miskâkoyek]

     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: [miskâcik, miskâcik] # SET I-Pl inv
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: [miskâskik, miskâskik]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: [miskâkoyâhkik, miskâkoyâhkik]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: [miskâkoyahkok, miskâkoyahkok]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: [miskâkoyêkok, miskâkoyêkok]

     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: [miskâtân, miskâtân] # SET II inv
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: [miskâtâhk, miskâtâhk]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: [miskâtakok, miskâtakok]

     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [miskâkot, miskâkot] # SET III inv
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [miskâkocik, miskâkocik]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: [miskâkoyit, miskâkoyit]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: [miskâyit, miskâyit] # SET IV inv
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: [miskâyisk, miskâyisk]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: [miskâkoyâhk, miskâkoyâhk, miskâkowâyâhk, miskâkowâyâhk]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: [miskâkoyêk, miskâkoyêk, miskâkowâyêk, miskâkowâyêk]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: [miskâkoyahk, miskâkoyahk, miskâkowâyahk, miskâkowâyahk]
     
